New York, session 2025-2026, A5688.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 206 of the vehicle and traffic law, as added by 2 chapter 141 of the laws of 1969, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 206. Deputization of agents. 1. The commissioner may, in [his] their 4 discretion, deputize any person to act for the commissioner, subject to 5 rules and limitations prescribed by [him] the commissioner, for the 6 purpose of issuing or renewing licenses, registrations and number 7 plates. Any such license, registration or number plate so issued or 8 renewed shall be subject to cancellation by the commissioner, if improp- 9 erly issued. Such deputies shall not receive compensation from the state 10 under this [section] subdivision, and no fee in addition to the fees 11 prescribed by law shall be charged any applicant unless such fee has 12 been approved by the commissioner. The commissioner may, without a hear- 13 ing, revoke at any time the authority granted to any person under this 14 [section] subdivision. 15 2. The commissioner shall deputize a person to act for the commission- 16 er, subject to rules and limitations prescribed by the commissioner, for 17 the purpose of issuing or renewing licenses, registrations and number 18 plates for persons living on Fishers Island in the town of Southold, 19 county of Suffolk. In carrying out the provisions of this subdivision, 20 such deputy shall issue and renew such licenses, including the adminis- 21 tration of written and road tests, eye examinations and photographs, 22 registrations and number plates from a facility located on Fishers 23 Island. Such facility shall be available for service twice annually, and 24 shall be operated each time for a period of time to be determined by the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01617-01-5 A. 5688 2 1 commissioner, but for not less than two business days. Any such license, 2 registration or number plate so issued or renewed shall be subject to 3 cancellation by the commissioner, if improperly issued. Such deputy 4 shall not receive compensation from the state under this section, and no 5 fee in addition to the fees prescribed by law shall be charged any 6 applicant unless such fee has been approved by the commissioner. The 7 commissioner may, without a hearing, revoke at any time the authority 8 granted to such person under this subdivision. In lieu of a deputy, the 9 commissioner may utilize employees of the department. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 11 have become a law.